Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
453

MEDICINE
AND SURGERY

Part I. Generally

Section

453-1 Practice of medicine defined

453-1.3 Practice of telehealth

453-1.5 Pain management guidelines

453-2 License required; exceptions

453-3 Limited and temporary licenses

453-3.1 Repealed

453-3.2 Educational teaching license

453-3.5 Training replacement temporary license

453-4 Qualifications for examination and
licensure

453-4.5 Foreign medical graduates; alternative
qualifications

453-5 Hawaii medical board; appointment,
removal,

qualifications

453-5.1 Powers and duties of board

453-5.2 Repealed

453-5.3 Physician assistant; licensure required

453-5.4 Physician assistant advisory committee

453-5.5 Physician assistant; authority to sign documents

453-6 Fees; expenses

453-6.5 Repealed

453-7 Form of license

453-7.5 Review of complaints and information by
department

453-8 Revocation, limitation, suspension, or
denial of

licenses

453-8.1 Voluntary limitation of license

453-8.2 Disciplinary action

453-8.3 Repealed

453-8.4 Summary suspension

453-8.5 Repealed

453-8.6 Discipline based on action taken by
another state

or federal agency; conditions; prohibition
on

practice

453-8.7 Reporting requirements

453-8.8 Physician workforce assessment fee;
license; physician

workforce information

453-9 Repealed

453-10 Witnesses in such proceeding

453-11 Recalcitrant witnesses; contempt

453-12 Perjury

453-13 Penalty

453-14 Duty of physician, osteopathic physician, surgeon,

hospital, clinic, etc., to report wounds

453-15 Who shall give consent to a postmortem
examination

453-16 Intentional termination of pregnancy;
penalties;

refusal to perform

453-17 Subpoena of peer review adverse decision
report

453-18 Pelvic examinations on anesthetized or
unconscious

female patients

Part II. Emergency Medical Service
Personnel

453-31 Emergency ambulance service personnel

453-32 Certification of emergency ambulance
personnel

453-32.1 Renewal of certification

453-32.5 Temporary certification

453-32.51 Limited temporary certification

453-32.6 Delegation to committee of practicing
emergency

physicians or osteopathic physicians and
emergency

ambulance personnel

453-33 Rules

Part III. Expedited Partner Therapy

453-51 Definitions

453-52 Expedited partner therapy

453-53 Information sheet

453-54 Limitation of liability

Cross References

Sunset evaluations modified, see §§26H-4 and 26H-5.

Breast density mammography results; report and notification,
see §321-46.

Client-patient referrals, health care provider practices
regulated, see §431:10C-308.7.

Filing of electronic mail address, see §451D-5.

Health care peer review, see chapter 671D.

Health care professionals, see chapter 451D.

Health maintenance organization act, see chapter 432D.

Immunity for prescribing, dispensing, or distributing opioid
antagonists, see chapter 329E.

Physicians, appointment as child custody evaluators, see
§571-46.4.

Primary health care incentive program, see §321-1.5.

Law Journals and Reviews

Driving into the Sunset: A Proposal for Mandatory Reporting
to the DMV by Physicians Treating Unsafe Elderly Drivers. 25 UH L. Rev. 59
(2002).

Medical Malpractice in Hawai‘i: Tort Crisis or Crisis of
Medical Errors? 30 UH L. Rev. 167 (2007).

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next